src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - кал: # Ordinary nouns 'fish' - full paradigm including MWN
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: кал
     кал+N+SP+Gen+Indef: калонь
     кал+N+SP+Abl+Indef: калда
     кал+N+SP+Dat+Indef: калонди
     кал+N+SP+Abe+Indef: калфтома
     кал+N+SP+Comp+Indef: калшка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+Indef: калса
     кал+N+SP+Ela+Indef: калста
     кал+N+SP+Ill+Indef: калс
     кал+N+SP+Prl+Indef: калга
     кал+N+SP+Tra+Indef: калкс
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: калозе
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: калоне
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: калозень
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: калнень
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [калозти, калозенди]
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: калненди
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: калдон
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: калфтомон
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: калшкан
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: калсон
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: калстон
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: калозон
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: калган
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: калце
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: калхне
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: калцень
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: калхнень
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: калдот
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: калфтомот
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: калшкат
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: калсот
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: калстот
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: калозот
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: калгат
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: калц
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: калонза
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: калонц
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: калонзон
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: калонцты
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: калонзонды
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: калдонза
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: калфтомонза
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: калшканза
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: калсонза
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: калстонза
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: калзонза
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: калганза
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: калоньке
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: калоньконь
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: калоньконди
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: калдонк
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: калфтомонк
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: калшканк
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: калсонк
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: калстонк
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: калзонк
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: калганк
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: калонте
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: калонтень
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: калонтенди
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: калдонт
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: калфтомонт
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: калшкант
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: калсонт
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: калстонт
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: калозонт
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: калгант
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: калсна
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: калснон
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: калснонды
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: калдост
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: калфтомост
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: калшкаст
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: калсост
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: калстост
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: калозост
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: калгаст
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: калхт
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def: калсь
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+Def: калть
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [калти, калонди]
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Def: калхне
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+Def: калхнень
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+Def: калхненди
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: каловок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: калоньвок
     #кал+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: калоньге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Clt/Add: сонга 
     кал+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: калдовок
     кал+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: калоньдивок
     кал+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: калфтомовок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Clt/Add: калшкавок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: калсовок
     кал+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: калстовок
     кал+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: калска
     кал+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: калгавок
     кал+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: калкска
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калозевок
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калоневок
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калозеньге
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калоненьге
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [калозтивок, калозендивок]
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калонендивок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калдонга
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калфтомонга
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калшканка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калсонга
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калстонга
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калозонга
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: калганга
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калцевок
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калхневок
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калценьге
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калхненьге
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калдотка
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калфтомотка
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калшкатка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калсотка
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калстотка
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калозотка
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: калгатка
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калцевок
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калонзовок
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калонцка
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калонзонга
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калонцтывок
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калонзондывок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калдонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калфтомонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калшканзовок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калсонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калстонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калзонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: калганзовок
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калонькевок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калоньконьге
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калонькондивок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калдонковок
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калфтомонковок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калшканковок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калсонковок
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калстонковок
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калзонковок
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: калганковок
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калонтевок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калонтеньге
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калонтендивок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калдонтка
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калфтомонтовок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калшкантовок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калсонтка
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калстонтка
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калозонтка
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: калгантка
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калсновок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калснонга
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калснондывок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калдостка
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калфтомостка
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калшкастка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калсостка
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калстостка
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калозостка
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: калгастка
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: калхтка
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: калське
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: калтьке
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [калтивок, калоньдивок]
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: калхневок
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: калхненьге
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: калхнендивок
